Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9B-109] Examination authority. (a)
A reinsurance intermediary shall be subject to examination by the
commissioner. The commissioner shall have access to all books, bank accounts,
and records of the reinsurance intermediary in a form usable by the
commissioner.

(b) A reinsurance intermediary-manager may be
examined as if it were the reinsurer. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next